Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2107
Offices; location.

A development corporation may maintain an office or offices in such place or places within the State of Nebraska as may be fixed by the board of directors.

Laws 1967, c. 100, § 7, p. 304.